02_Morphology/fin/fin.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                   ! Nimisana
%<cmp%>                 ! Yhdyssana
%<nom%>                 ! Nominatiivi
%<gen%>                 ! Genetiivi

%>                      ! Morfeemiraja
%+                      ! Yhdyssanaraja (leksikaalinen puoli)
%#                      ! Yhdyssanaraja

LEXICON Root

Nouns  ;

LEXICON Cmp

           # ;
%<cmp%>%+:%# Nouns ;

LEXICON 9  ! kala

%<nom%>:    # ;
%<gen%>:%>n Cmp ;

LEXICON 10 ! koira

%<nom%>:    # ;
%<gen%>:%>n Cmp ;

LEXICON Nouns

kissa%<n%>:kissa 9 ;  ! "кошка", "cat"
kala%<n%>:kala 9 ;    ! "рыба", "fish"
korva%<n%>:korva 10 ; ! "ухо", "ear"
koira%<n%>:koira 10 ; ! "собака", "dog"
